Hawaii statutes.
[§526-6] Disclaimer of interest in
property. (a) In this section:

(1) "Time of distribution" means the time
when a disclaimed interest would have taken effect in possession or enjoyment.

(2) "Future interest" means an interest
that takes effect in possession or enjoyment, if at all, later than the time of
its creation.

(b) Except for a disclaimer governed by
section 526-7 or 526-8, the following rules apply to a disclaimer of an
interest in property:

(1) The disclaimer takes effect as of the time the
instrument creating the interest becomes irrevocable, or, if the interest arose
under the law of intestate succession, as of the time of the intestate's death.

(2) The disclaimed interest passes according to any
provision in the instrument creating the interest providing for the disposition
of the interest, should it be disclaimed, or of disclaimed interests in
general.

(3) If the instrument does not contain a provision
described in paragraph (2), the following rules apply:

(A) If the disclaimant is an individual, the
disclaimed interest passes as if the disclaimant had died immediately before
the time of distribution. However, if, by law or under the instrument, the
descendants of the disclaimant would share in the disclaimed interest by any
method of representation had the disclaimant died before the time of
distribution, the disclaimed interest passes only to the descendants of the
disclaimant who survive the time of distribution.

(B) If the disclaimant is not an individual,
the disclaimed interest passes as if the disclaimant did not exist.

(4) Upon the disclaimer of a preceding interest, a
future interest held by a person other than the disclaimant takes effect as if
the disclaimant had died or ceased to exist immediately before the time of distribution,
but a future interest held by the disclaimant is not accelerated in possession
or enjoyment. [L 2000, c 43, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next